District of Columbia statutes.
47-1501

Repealed

Assessment — Board of Assistant Assessors.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 24, 34 DCR 850
National Capital Region Transportation, revenues allocated to the Metrorail/Metrobus Account, see § 9-1111.15.
1981 Ed., § 47-1501.